lt-LT.aff
FLAG num
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst_short
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Voc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Dual
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Dual
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Dual
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Dual
AM is:Optative
AM is:Indic_Past_Sg_I
AM is:Indic_Past_Sg_II
AM is:Indic_Past_Sg_III
AM is:Indic_Past_Pl_I
AM is:Indic_Past_Pl_I_short
AM is:Indic_Past_Pl_II
AM is:Indic_Past_Pl_II_short
AM is:Indic_Past_Pl_III
AM is:Indic_Past_III
AM is:Indic_Past_Sg_III_short
AM is:Indic_Past_Sg_I_short
AM is:Indic_Past_Sg_II_short
AM is:Indic_Past_Pl_III_short
AM is:Indic_Past_III_short
AM is:Obli_Past_Masc_Sg
AM is:Obli_Past_Masc_Pl
AM is:Obli_Past_Fem_Sg
AM is:Obli_Past_Fem_Sg_short
AM is:Obli_Past_Fem_Pl
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Nom_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Voc_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Neut
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Nom_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Voc_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Inst_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Nom_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Voc_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Voc
AM is:Gerund_Past
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Dual
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Dual
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Dual
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Dual
AM is:none
AM is:Super_short_rare
AM is:rare
AM is:Super_short

SFX 1 Y 4
SFX 1 as as . 37
SFX 1 as o . 38
SFX 1 ai ai . 39
SFX 1 ai ų . 40

SFX 3 Y 10
SFX 3 as ui . 41
SFX 3 as ą . 42
SFX 3 as u . 43
SFX 3 as e . 44
SFX 3 ai ams . 45
SFX 3 ai am . 46
SFX 3 ai us . 47
SFX 3 ai ais . 48
SFX 3 ai uose . 49
SFX 3 ai uos . 50

SFX 7 Y 1
SFX 7 as e . 51

SFX 8 Y 1
SFX 8 ukas uk . 51

SFX 9 Y 1
SFX 9 as ai . 51

SFX 10 Y 2
SFX 10 as an . 52
SFX 10 ai uosna . 53

SFX 11 Y 1
SFX 11 as u . 54

SFX 12 Y 2
SFX 12 as ai . 39
SFX 12 as ų . 40

SFX 14 Y 6
SFX 14 as ams . 45
SFX 14 as am . 46
SFX 14 as us . 47
SFX 14 as ais . 48
SFX 14 as uose . 49
SFX 14 as uos . 50

SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 as ai . 55

SFX 21 Y 1
SFX 21 as uosna . 53

SFX 30 Y 1
SFX 30 ai ai . 55

SFX 32 Y 4
SFX 32 as as . 56
SFX 32 as o . 57
SFX 32 ai ai . 58
SFX 32 ai ų . 59

SFX 34 Y 10
SFX 34 as ui . 60
SFX 34 as ą . 61
SFX 34 as u . 62
SFX 34 as e . 63
SFX 34 ai ams . 64
SFX 34 ai am . 65
SFX 34 ai us . 66
SFX 34 ai ais . 67
SFX 34 ai uose . 68
SFX 34 ai uos . 69

SFX 38 Y 2
SFX 38 as e . 70
SFX 38 ai ai . 71

SFX 39 Y 2
SFX 39 as an . 72
SFX 39 ai uosna . 73

SFX 40 Y 1
SFX 40 as u . 74

SFX 41 Y 2
SFX 41 as ai . 58
SFX 41 as ų . 59

SFX 43 Y 6
SFX 43 as ams . 64
SFX 43 as am . 65
SFX 43 as us . 66
SFX 43 as ais . 67
SFX 43 as uose . 68
SFX 43 as uos . 69

SFX 49 Y 1
SFX 49 as ai . 71

SFX 50 Y 1
SFX 50 as uosna . 73

SFX 61 Y 2
SFX 61 ai ai . 39
SFX 61 ai ų . 40

SFX 63 Y 6
SFX 63 ai ams . 45
SFX 63 ai am . 46
SFX 63 ai us . 47
SFX 63 ai ais . 48
SFX 63 ai uose . 49
SFX 63 ai uos . 50

SFX 69 Y 1
SFX 69 ai ai . 55

SFX 70 Y 1
SFX 70 ai uosna . 53

SFX 71 Y 4
SFX 71 as as . 37
SFX 71 as o . 38
SFX 71 ai ai . 39
SFX 71 ai ų . 40

SFX 73 Y 17
SFX 73 as ui . 41
SFX 73 as ą . 42
SFX 73 as u . 43
SFX 73 ias yje [^č]ias 44
SFX 73 čias tyje čias 44
SFX 73 ias y [^č]ias 75
SFX 73 ias yj [^č]ias 76
SFX 73 čias ty čias 75
SFX 73 as uje jas 44
SFX 73 as uj jas 75
SFX 73 as u . 54
SFX 73 ai ams . 45
SFX 73 ai am . 46
SFX 73 ai us . 47
SFX 73 ai ais . 48
SFX 73 ai uose . 49
SFX 73 ai uos . 50

SFX 82 Y 2
SFX 82 as yje jas 44
SFX 82 as y jas 75

SFX 85 Y 4
SFX 85 as au jas 51
SFX 85 as y [^č]ias 51
SFX 85 čias ty [^š]čias 51
SFX 85 čias ti ščias 51

SFX 89 Y 1
SFX 89 as i . 51

SFX 90 Y 3
SFX 90 as e . 51
SFX 90 as iau . 51
SFX 90 as ie . 51

SFX 93 Y 3
SFX 93 as an . 52
SFX 93 as uosna . 53
SFX 93 ai uosna . 53

SFX 94 Y 1
SFX 94 as in jas 52

SFX 95 Y 1
SFX 95 as in . 52

SFX 96 Y 1
SFX 96 as in . 52

SFX 98 Y 2
SFX 98 as ai . 39
SFX 98 as ų . 40

SFX 100 Y 6
SFX 100 as ams . 45
SFX 100 as am . 46
SFX 100 as us . 47
SFX 100 as ais . 48
SFX 100 as uose . 49
SFX 100 as uos . 50

SFX 106 Y 1
SFX 106 as ai . 55

SFX 116 Y 1
SFX 116 ai ai . 55

SFX 118 Y 6
SFX 118 is is . 37
SFX 118 ys ys . 37
SFX 118 is io . 38
SFX 118 ys io . 38
SFX 118 ai ai . 39
SFX 118 ai ų . 40

SFX 122 Y 16
SFX 122 is iui . 41
SFX 122 ys iui . 41
SFX 122 is į . 42
SFX 122 ys į . 42
SFX 122 is iu . 43
SFX 122 ys iu . 43
SFX 122 is yje . 44
SFX 122 ys yje . 44
SFX 122 is y . 75
SFX 122 ys y . 75
SFX 122 ai ams . 45
SFX 122 ai am . 46
SFX 122 ai us . 47
SFX 122 ai ais . 48
SFX 122 ai uose . 49
SFX 122 ai uos . 50

SFX 132 Y 5
SFX 132 is i . 51
SFX 132 ys y . 51
SFX 132 is au brolis 51
SFX 132 is iau dievulėlis 51
SFX 132 ai ai . 55

SFX 136 Y 1
SFX 136 is 0 . 77

SFX 137 Y 3
SFX 137 is in . 52
SFX 137 ys in . 52
SFX 137 ai uosna . 53

SFX 139 Y 2
SFX 139 is iu . 54
SFX 139 ys iu . 54

SFX 141 Y 4
SFX 141 is iai . 39
SFX 141 ys iai . 39
SFX 141 is ių . 40
SFX 141 ys ių . 40

AF 1,3,9,30,9999 # 1
AF 1,3,7,10,12,14,20,21,30,9999 # 6
AF 1,3,9,12,14,20,30,9999 # 7
AF 1,3,10,12,14,21,9999 # 9
AF 61,63,69,9999 # 10
AF 118,122,132,141,145,157,9999 # 11
AF 1,3,7,10,30,9999 # 23
AF 118,122,132,9999 # 26
AF 1,3,7,30,9999 # 28
AF 61,63,69,70,9999 # 29
AF 1,3,8,10,12,14,20,21,30,9999 # 30
AF 118,122,132,137,141,145,157,159,9999 # 37
AF 118,122,137,141,145,159,9999 # 41
AF 71,73,85,93,98,100,106,116,9999 # 46
AF 1,3,8,9,30,9999 # 53
AF 118,122,132,136,9999 # 54
AF 118,122,132,136,137,141,145,157,159,9999 # 62
AF 118,122,132,137,9999 # 63
AF 1,3,8,9,12,14,20,30,9999 # 64
AF 71,73,89,93,95,98,100,106,116,9999 # 276
AF 71,73,82,85,93,94,98,100,106,116,9999 # 305
AF 32,34,38,39,41,43,49,50,9999 # 308
AF 71,73,90,93,96,98,100,106,116,9999 # 387
