lt-LT.dic
Bolmantas/7	6
bromazepamas/6	5
Būdapas/7	6
Būdavas/7	6
būdinys/41	5
chantai/29	5
chiromantas/6	5
dantelis/62	5
Daukas/64	6
dievulis/62	5
dioksidas/6	5
diolaminas/9	5
Dubosas/7	6
elnias/276	5
Elvikis/11	6
Elvis/26	4
Enuksonas/7	6
epinefrinas/9	5
Erlėnai/10	7
erškėtiniai/29	5
Ešerys/11	6
fakyras/6	5
frakcionuotojas/46	5
frezuotojas/46	5
galvotojas/46	5
galąstojas/46	5
gaubtuvas/6	5
glotnučiai/29	5
granulitas/6	5
graužas/6	5
Grikšelis/11	6
gyvulėlis/62	5
Hampšyras/28	7
Joniukas/53	4
Kadauskas/7	6
Kadusauskas/7	6
kampelis/62	5
kaupavimas/6	5
kiršintojas/46	5
kišėjas/46	5
Klečkauskas/7	6
Kloviniai/10	7
Kluoniškiai/10	7
kolpingas/23	5
komandoras/6	5
kompromituotojas/46	5
konsoliduotojas/46	5
kraujas/305	5
Kristianstadas/28	7
Krukonis/11	6
krumpliastiebis/37	5
kryžmažiedžiai/29	5
Kulvinskis/26	6
kursografas/6	5
Laurinčiukas/64	6
leviatanas/6	5
Liudelis/54	4
metilfenobarbitalis/41	5
Mireckas/7	6
mirktelėjimas/6	5
nakvynpinigiai/29	5
naltreksonas/9	5
namudininkas/6	5
Napoleonas/1	4
nedraugas/308	5
nekrikštas/308	5
nenurodymas/23	5
neorenesansas/6	5
Novagrockas/7	6
nuleidėjas/46	5
nuodytojas/46	5
nuotėkis/37	5
otolitai/29	5
ovalas/6	5
Ožaičiai/10	7
pakrovėjas/46	5
paleidėjas/46	5
papeikimas/6	5
papukas/30	5
patamsinimas/6	5
pataupymas/6	5
Paunksnis/11	6
Pauparys/11	6
pašlemėkas/308	5
Petreikis/11	6
Podlipskas/7	6
poetas/6	5
Povilėlis/54	4
protestuotojas/46	5
protezuotojas/46	5
purškimas/6	5
rašytojas/46	5
registras/6	5
registruotojas/46	5
Sedziniauskas/7	6
seismografas/6	5
silpnavalis/37	5
simuliakras/6	5
Smėliai/10	7
snaputiniai/29	5
sovietiškumas/23	5
spartuolis/37	5
sriegimas/6	5
stimburys/37	5
stipinkaulis/63	5
strazdiniai/29	5
svajoklis/37	5
Tabakajevas/7	6
traukinukas/30	5
trinktelėjimas/6	5
užvadas/308	5
velnias/387	5
Vilmantėlis/54	4
vizuotojas/46	5
vykdytojas/46	5
vėjas/305	5
įsisenėjimas/6	5
įsiveržimas/6	5
įvertintojas/46	5
ėjėjas/46	5
Šalteniai/10	7
šaltibarščiai/29	5
Šeižys/11	6
Šimkonis/11	6
šimtadienis/37	5
Šolomskas/7	6
Šošas/7	6
Šuklys/11	6
žabtas/308	5
žiurkininkas/6	5
žonkilis/37	5
